Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.169

Electric-assisted bicycle—Class 1 electric-assisted bicycle—Class 2 electric-assisted bicycle—Class 3 electric-assisted bicycle.

"Electric-assisted bicycle" means a bicycle with two or three wheels, a saddle, fully operative pedals for human propulsion, and an electric motor. The electric-assisted bicycle's electric motor must have a power output of no more than seven hundred fifty watts. The electric-assisted bicycle must meet the requirements of one of the following three classifications:

(1) "Class 1 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle in which the motor provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour;

(2) "Class 2 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle in which the motor may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle and is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour; or

(3) "Class 3 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle in which the motor provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per hour and is equipped with a speedometer.

[ 2018 c 60 s 1; 1997 c 328 s 1.]